Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1625
Agent's permit; renewal; application.

At least thirty days prior to the expiration of an agent's permit, the agent shall complete and file with the department an application form for renewal thereof. The application shall be reviewed and acted upon as provided for an initial application.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 25;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 25;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2825;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 25.